Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-5] Harm reduction
organization; opioid antagonist; exemption. Notwithstanding any other law
or regulation to the contrary, a person or harm reduction organization acting
under a standing order may store an opioid antagonist without being subject to
chapter 328, except part VII, and may distribute an opioid antagonist; provided
that the distribution is done without charge or compensation. [L 2016, c 68, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next